Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-409
Apprehension of persons.

(1) Apprehension is the taking into custody of a person.

(2) Any person authorized under regulations governing the armed forces to apprehend persons subject to this code or to trial thereunder may do so upon reasonable belief that an offense has been committed and that the person apprehended committed it.

(3) All officers, warrant officers, and noncommissioned officers shall have authority to quell all quarrels, frays, and disorders among persons subject to this code and to apprehend persons subject to this code who take part in the same.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 9, p. 1556.